print/tex/TeX3.14/contrib/tex/hyphen/hyphen.dutch.min.tex
%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%
% These are TeX hyphenation patterns for Dutch generated at the
% Computer Science Department of Utrecht University.
% Padualaan 14, P.O. Box 80.089, 3508 TB Utrecht, The Netherlands.
% Telephone: +31-30-531454, e-mail: postmaster@cs.ruu.nl
%
% Copyright (c) 1989 by CELEX.
% CELEX, Wundtlaan 1, 6525 XD Nijmegen, The Netherlands.
% Telephone: +31-80-615751, email: celex@hnympi52.bitnet
%
% General permission for non-profit usage is granted.
% For commercial usage contact CELEX at the above address.
% Copying of this file is only permitted with inclusion of
% this copyright notice and with these same restrictions.
%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%
\patterns{%
.ad3ek
.ad3eq
.ad3op
.ad3or
.ad3s
.af3ra
.al3f
.al4st
.am3p
.an3d4
.an4kl
.an3th
.ap2n
.ar3tr
.as3p
.as1t
.as3tr
.at4r
.ba3ta
.be3la
.bij1
.bli4
.bu2s
.ca4te.
.ce4len
.co4ler
.culot4
.da4gi
.dag3r
.da4k
.de2a
.de3ra
.de3ro
.di4s
.ed3w
.ek3s
.ek4w
.elo3
.en3t
.er4f3l
.erop3
.ert4
.er3ui
.es3
.exi1
.gaat3
.ga4me.
.ge3f
.ge3la
.ge3n4a
.ge3r4a
.ges4
.ge3sk
.he2a
.he2r
.her3i
.her3u
.ho4les
.ho4met
.hy4de
.ij2s
.ij4s3l
.ima4ge
.in1
.in3d4
.ink4
.in3s4
.in3t
.jes2
.ka4taa
.ka4te.
.ke3ra
.ker4kl
.le4b
.le4go
.le4gr
.len4s
.les3
.le3th
.luit4
.mein3
.me3so
.mo4s
.mos3k
.na3fl
.na1s
.och3
.oe4r
.oe4s3
.olf4
.olie3
.om1a
.on1
.on3i
.on3s
.on2t
.pa2k
.pe4te.
.prik3
.puit4
.quit4
.raat4
.ran4ch
.read3
.re4mol
.res3p
.rijk4s
.ro4l
.ro4q
.ro4sk
.sa4p
.sce4ne
.se4st
.se2t
.sha4
.ski3s
.sli2
.snap3
.st2
.ste4m3
.sty4
.sul3
.taat4
.tan4da
.ta3ro
.te4f
.tek2
.ten4tj
.te4ra
.ter4pa
.thee3
.ti4me
.ti4na
.to2s
.traat4
.ts4
.tu4ne.
.ui2
.ui3le
.uit1
.uit4je
.van3o
.veld3
.ver1
.vu4l3
.was3t
.we2l
.wel3o
.wet4s
.work3
.xe1
.ya2l
.zes3
.zit3
a4a4
aad3a
aad3o
aad3r
aag1
aag3r
aags4
aai1
aak1
aak3l
aak3r
aak3w
aal1a
2aald
aal1e
aal3k
aal1o
4aalr
4aalv
aam1
aan1
aan3a
1aanj
aan3sp
3aanwi
aap1a
aar1
aar4th
aas3e
aas3f
aas3p
aat3a
aat3h
aat3o
aat3r
a1b
abak4s3
aba4s
abe4la
able2
a4ble.
a4bles
3abonn
ab3ru
4ace
a2ce.
a3cee
a3cep
a4cer.
a4cers
a4ces
2ach.
a3cha
2a1che
4a1chi
a1cho
a3chr
4achs
a1chu
2acl
2aco
2acr
4acs
a1d
2ad.
ad2a
ad3aa
ad3ad
ada2r3
a4dete
ade4tj
2adi
2adl
ad3ora
2adp
3adres
ad3sla
4ady
2ae
aege4
aek4
ael4
a4fau
af3d
af1dw
4afe
af3ei
afe4la
1afg
2afi
a4fin
af3l
2afo
afon4d
af1r
af3ric
af3ris
af3rit
af3ru
af3s
a4fu
3afzet
4aga
ag1ad
agas4s
age2o
a4gins
ag3le
ag3ord
ag3reg
ag3roo
ag3sla
ag4spr
a4g3uu
a1h
4ah.
ah3l
ai1e
aig4
aik4
ails4
ai4lu
2ais4
ai3sc
ai1so
ai4sol
ai1t
4a1j
2ak.
ak3arb
a4ked
aker4se
a2kes
a2kez
2akh
akhou4
ak3id
a2k1l
ak3la
ak3lo
ak3na
ak3ne
a4kog
ak3ond
4akp
2aks
4aks.
ak1st
4akt.
ak3we
a1la
alan4st
a4lap
2ald
a2lel
a4lents
al2fe
alf3l
alf2r
4alia
al4kank
al4kro
al4mac
al4mol
a1lo
al3omt
alo4n
al3ph
als3j
al2sl
als3oo
al4stem
al4sti
al3tha
a1lu
4ambe
1ambt
ame4ran
3ameu
4amm
am2pl
am4se
am4sm
am4sn
am2sp
am3spe
an2aa
an4af
a2na2g
an3arc
an4ded
2andj
and4ri
a4nec
an3emi
a3nen
an3est
an4gan
an4gap
anges4
an2gr
a3ni
4ank.
an4kaa
an4kak
an4kas
an4kna
an2kr
ank3ro
annet4
ano3st
an3scr
an2so
an2sp
antes4
ant2h
an3tha
a4nuu
anval4s
a1o
a2ob
a4op4
4ap.
a1pa
a2pe.
a4ped
ap3j
ap3le
a1plu
a1po
1appa
3appr
a1pr
a4p3rij
april3
ap2sl
ap2sp
2apu
a1py
a1q
a4ques
4ar.
a1ra
ar2da
ard3ac
ard3ol
ard3op
ar2dr
ar4dran
ard3ri
ard3w
a4rew
arg3l
3argum
a1ri
ari4an.
ari4ce
ariet4
ar3k4l
2arl
ar4map
ar4mu
ar4nes
a1ro
2aroo
ar4s1l
ars3la
ars3m
ar2sn
ar2so
ar4spa
ar4spr
ar4stek
ar4str
ar4tak
ar4tap
ar2tj
ar4top
ar2tr
art4sl
a3rus
a1ry
4asa
asal4
as1ap
a2sc
as4ch
as4cr
a2seb
a2sec
as4ee
a2sel
a3sem
as4en
as2hi
asi4on.
a2sl
as3lam
as3lan
as3li
aslijs4
as3m
as3pa
as3pi
as3pl
assi3s
3assoc
as1ta
as3tan
a4s3te
as4th
as3ti
as3ton
a1t
at1ac
a4talen
ata1s
a4taz
ate4rec
ate4rek
4atg
at2ha
a3thar
a2tj
3atlas
3atmos
2atn
a2t3re
a3trek
at2sl
at4slo
at2sp
at4stak
at4sti
at4stre
at2tu
2au
4au.
au1ch
au3e
3aug
au3kr
auli4ne
aul4le
aup2
aur2
4aus
au3sa
au1t4
3auto
au1wi
4auz
a1v
aven3s
ave3re
ave3ri
aver4u
a3vi
avil4l
1avo
4avot
a1w
4ay
ay4a
a1z
aze3s
1ba
baar3t
babe4
babet4
ba4ch
ba4da
ba4des
ba4dr
bag4h
ba4ka
bal4kla
ba3na
ba4ne.
ban4kl
ban4kn
ban4k3o
ban4kr
bank3w
ban4q
baseli4
bassi4
bas3t
2b1b
bbe4lag
bbe4lee
bbe4n
2b1c
2b1d
3be
be3am
be4art
be3dw
beet1
be3g4
beis4
bei4tj
be3ke
be3kl
be4lex
bel3k
bel3sp
be1ra
bergi4
ber4gl
ber4gr
be1r2o
be4ron
bers4k
ber4sto
be1s4
be3sm
be1tw
beur4s
2b1f
2bg
4b3h
1b2i
bid3s4
bi4du
bi3eu
bij3d
bij3k
bijs2
bij3sl
bij3sm
bin4dr
bin4tj
bio3
bis4a
bi3se
bis4tr
bi1tr
bit4se
2b1j
2b1k
1b4l
bleus4
3bli
blik3o
4blish
blok3
2b1m
b1n
1bo
boe4ga
boe4kn
boe3s4
bo4les
bo2ma
bom3aa
bo4mo
bonai4
bond4s
bon4tj
bon4to
boos4t3
bor4sto
bos3
bo4sp
bos4ses
bo2su
bo2th
bot3j
bo4tu
boven3
1b2r2
braat4
b4re
breis4
bri4a
bri4l
bro4n
2b1s2
b3s4c
b2sla
bsou4
2b1t2
bt4s3
1bu
buit4j
bus3c
bu2su
b1v
2bw
byr4
bys4
2b1z
1ca
ca4chem
cae3
cag4
ca2k
can4nes
ca3pa
ca2pe
cara4t
ca4re.
ca3ro
cas3t
cat2
ca3ta
cate4r
ca3th
2c1c
cce4s
1ce
cee2
cei4
3cel
celi4n
ce4lop
4cema
ce3na
2ceni
3cent
4cepa
ce3ra
ce3r4o
ce2s
ce3s2a
4cesp
ce3su
ce2tj
2ch.
chaar4s
4chav
2chc
2che.
4cheb
2cheg
2chek
che4lee
4chemu
4cheor
4chep
3cheq
che3ri
4chero
2ches
2chev
4chg
4chh
chi4k
4chm
4chn
cho3s
2chp
3chris
2cht
3chum
2chw
3ci
ci4al.
cier4s
ci1eu
ci4le.
ci4nen
ci1p
ci4so
ci3t4
c3j
2c2k
cka4
ck1en
ck3ers
ck3l
ck3n
cks4
1c2l
cle4v
c4li
cli4q
clo4ne.
clo4se.
cly4
2cn
cno4
1co
3co.
3coa
3cod
3col
co4le.
colet4
co2lu
3com
3con
con3g
con3s
cop4
3copa
co4pe.
co3pr
coquet4
3cor
co3ro
corp2
3cos
3cot
3cou
4cout
co2v
4c1q
c4ques
1c4r2
cra4y
2crib
3cris
cros4
crui4
2c1t
ct3ad
cte2n
c2th
cti4on.
cti4ons
c2tj
ctoi4
c2ton
cto4rin
ctu4re.
1cu
cu4ad
cuk4
3cul
cur3s
cy4th
c3z
1da
3daag
4daam
4daanb
d3aanw
2d1af
da3fr
da2ga
da4ged
da4gon
dag3op
da4gor
da2gr
da2gu
2d3akk
dak3l
da2k3r
4daks
4dalar
4dalm
d2ame
3dan
da4nas
dan4kl
dan4sm
dans3p
2d1ap
d2ape
3dapes
da2ra
2d1arb
3dari
dar2m
darm3a
das3t
4d3aut
da4ve.
2d1b4
dbou4wi
2d1c
2d3d2
dde4lev
dde2n
dde4red
dde4ree
dde3s
1de
de1ch
2deen
dee4r
dee3t
4deff
4deg.
2dei
de4klaa
de4klag
de4kna
4deksa
de4lac
4delas
del3dr
4delec
4delek
4d3elem
de4leng
de4lon
de4lov
del4sl
del4str
4demai
4demm
d4en.
de4nab
den4ac
den4du
de4nep
den4kof
den4kop
den4kr
de2no
den3oo
de3rab
de3ras
de4rei
de4rem
de4rep
de4ret
de4rim
de4rin.
der3k
der3na
der3of
der3on
der4sa
4derts
der1u
de2s
de4sk
de3sl
des4pel
de3sta
des3ti
de3sto
de3str
det2
de3ta
4deten
de3tw
dewin4d
2dex
3dex.
2d1f2
2d1g
d4ge.
d4ges.
d3g4l
2d1h
d3he
dhun4
1di
dia3s2
die2f
die4tra
di1eu
di2ga
dig3aa
2dijz
di4ko
2dind
2dinf
2dinr
2d1ins
4dinw
4dinz
di4sin
2d1j
2d1k
2d3l
dlan4de
dli2n
2d1m
dmoes4
2d3n
1do
2doef
doe2l
d4ok
dok4r
dolk3s
do2mo
dom2s
2dont
3donti
dont4l
2dop
do4pe.
do4pes
3dopj
d3o4pl
3dopt
2d1org
do3ro
dors3m
do3sk
2d3p2
dpren4
d2r2
3dra
4drand
4drap
4dras
d4re.
d3rec
d3red
d3rege
4d3rel
3dremp
d3resu
2dric
dries4
3d4rif
d3rijd
d3rijk
3drijv
3drin
3dris
d3rit
dri2v
4droei
3drog
4drok
d3rond
d3rood
4droos
d3rov
d4roy
4d3roz
4drug
drug4s
d3ruim
3druk
4drus
4ds
ds1a
dsa4d
ds2al
dsas3
d3sch
ds4cor
d4sed
d2see
d4sek
dse4la
d3sen
d4ses
dsex2
d2si
dsi4ga
d2sl
d3slaa
d3slac
ds3lie
d3slin
ds4mee
ds3na
ds3no
d3snu
ds1o
ds2oo
d4spal
d4spet
d1spi
d4spon
d3spor
ds4pre
d1st
d3sta
d4staal
d4stab
d4staf
d4stal
d3ste
d4stek
ds3th
d4stit
d2su
d3sur
2d3t2
1du
du4bl
2duil
dui4t
4duitg
du1o
dus3
du4wee
2d1v
2d1w
d2wa
d3waar
d3wac
4dwarm
4d3wat
d3weg
d4wei
d3wek
d3wer
d3wes3
d3wet
1dy
4dyo
dy2s3
2d1z
d2zj
e1a
e3aa
e3ac
e4ade.
e4ades
ea2di
ea4dor
ea2gu
e3ai
ea2k
e2akd
e4ake
e4ako
eals4
e2am
e3amb
e3and
e3ant
e4anu
ea2ri
ea2s
e4at.
e2ath
e4atm
eatri4
eatu4
eau4n
eau3s4t
e1b
ebo4k
e3br
e3cha
e1che
e1chi
e3cho
ec3le
3econo
ecor2
ec4tin
e1d
4ed.
e3dam
ed3ijz
e2dov
e3dru
edsel3
ed1sp
ed2w
e3dwan
e2e
ee2da
ee2f
eef3l
ee4gli
ee2gr
ee2k
eek1e
eek3n
ee3ko
ee3kri
eek3ur
eek3uu
ee2l
ee3led
ee3li
eel3k
eel4si
2eem
ee2n1
eeng4
een3k
een3sl
eep3ac
eer1a
ee2ri
eer3in
eer3k
eer3om
eer4ov
ee2s
ee3sc
ees4ch
ee4sem
ees3li
ee3smu
ee3spr
ees3te
ee2t
eet3h
eet3oo
eetra4
ee4tw
e4fad
ef3da
3effec
3effek
ef4fle
e1fl
e4fom
e1f2r
ef3sm
e1g
egas4k
e4gec
ege4las
ege4lov
e4gos
eg3s4
e1h
eid4sp
ei1e
eie3s
e1ij
eil3d
eil3m
ei2lo
e2in
ei4nap
ein4do
ein4dr
ein4du
ei4ned
ei4re.
ei2s3a
eis4lo
eis4p
eis4ta
eis4tel
eit2
ei1tj
ei4too
eit4s
eit3z
e3j2
e3kaa
e3kam
e3kas
2eke
ek4er
ek2et
e4kez
ek3ins
e4klast
e3kled
ek3les
e4koli
ek3ov
ek4ru
ek1sa
3eksam
3eksem
eks1p
e1kw
e1la
el1ac
el1af
el3arb
e4las.
el2dr
e2lel
e3len
e3lep
e4lert
e4leta
e3lev
el4faa
el4fend
3elfta
el3gl
e3lig
e4lind
e4linga
eli4p
3elix
elk3s4
e1lo
e2lob
e3lok
e2lol
el3oli
e4lom
el3ops
e2lor
el4sj
els2u
e1lu
e1m
emes3
em3ins
e4mir
en1ac
e2nak
en3akk
e2nal
en3ana
e2nap
en3app
e2nas
en3asi
ena4sp
e2nav
e2naz
en4ce.
en3dar
ende4ra
en4dur
e2nec
en3ech
en3eil
ene4n3
e4nent
e3ner
e4nerf
3energ
e4nerv
e3nes
e4nete
e2nex
en3ga
enge3s
engs4
e4nid
enier4t
e4nink
e3nis
4enkl
en4kre
e2non
enoot3
en1op
eno4pl
e2nor
e3nor.
en3ord
en1ov
en2sl
en2sn
en2so
ens3on
en4stin
ent2h
en4trol
ent4sl
ent4sp
en1ui
e2nun
en3ur
e2nuu
e1o
eoga4
e3on
eonti4n
e3op
eop4l
eop4r
e4or4ge
eo1ro
eo3s4
eota4
e1p
ep2a
e4paf
ep4ap
e4peen
3epid
ep3j
e4poge
ep2s
eps3pr
ep4tr
e1q
e3ra.
e3raad
e4raap.
er1ac
er3afd
e1rai
er3aks
e4rall
e3ranc
e3rape
e1rat
e2rav
erd2a
erd4i
er3do
er3d4w
e3rec
er3eff
e4reig
er3eks
erel2
ere4neg
ere4se.
ere4tj
e4rets
er3gl
e1ri
erie3s
erie3t
e3rif
e3rig
e3rij.
e3rije
e4rijs
e4rijz
e4r3ind
er3ins
e4r3int
erip4
e3ris
e3riz
er3ma
er3mo
e3ro.
e1rob
e4roc
e1rod
e1roe
e4roed
e3rok
e1rol
er3oli
e3roma
er3omk
er1on
e3ron.
er3oog
er3oor
e2r1op
ero4pi
e4r1or
e1ros
e3rot
er1ov
er3oxy
ert4h
er3tr
e1ru
e3ruim
eruit4j
eru2m
e2r3ur
er3uu
4es.
e3san
e3sas
e3sch
e3sem
e3shop
es3ill
e3sjo
3eskad
e1s2m
e1sn
e1so
e3sol
e1sp
es3pek
e4spen
es4poo
e3stad
es4tak
e4s3te.
e3s4tem
es3ten
es3ter
es4teu
e2sti
es3tig
es3tin
e3stof
e1stu
e3sy
e1ta
e3tali
et4ana
eta4p
e4tau
e3te
etek4k
ete3ra
e1th
et2ha
et3ham
etien4
e3til
e3ting
e1tj
et2jo
e1to
e3ton
e1tr
et3rui
et3sap
et4sla
et4sli
et2sp
ets3pr
et4stek
et3s4u
e1tu
et2w
e3twi
4eu.
eu4ce
eu3e
eug4dr
eug4r
2eui
e1uit
eu4ler
e3um.
eu4na
eun3s
eun3t
eu4rad
eu4rat
eu4rij
eus3t
eut2h
2eu2w1
e1v
eval4s
even4st
eve3ri
evol4ga
e1w
ew2h
e3wi
1exam
1exem
4exi
1exp
3extr
ey2n
eys4
e1z
4ez.
ezen4s
ezin4s
1fa
f3aar
f4ab
face4
2f1ach
fa4den
f4ag
fa2ke
fal4to
4fana
fant4
fa4re.
3fase
f2av
2f1b
f1c
2fd
f2da
f4dele
fde4s3
fdes4m
f4dh
f2din
f3doe
f1dr
fd4ra
fd4ru
fd2w
1fe
fe2a
fede1
fee4l
f3een
3fees
fe4lov
3fem
fen3t
fe3rab
fe3ran
fe4ret
fes3
fes4p
fe4tj
feur4
2fex
2f1f2
ff3s4
f3fu
4f3g2
fge1
fgo4v
4f1h
1fi
fi3ch
3fie
fie3tj
2f1ijz
fi4le.
film3a
fi4nel
fi4no
4fint
fisto3
f1j
2f1k
f2l4
f3laf
fle2t
4flie
4f3lij
f4lip
f4lor
f4lot
f3loz
2f3m
fma4d
f1n
1fo
2foef
2f3of
f3oms
fon3te
f3oog
2f1o2p
2f3org
3form
for4tj
fo1ru
2f3oud
foy4
2f3p
fr2
1fra
fra4m
f2ras
f2raz
f3reg
fre4t
f4rez
f2ri
f3rij
fri4te
f2rod
4frol
fru3g
2f1s
f2sa
f3sch
f3sel
f4sh
fsho4
f3s2j
f4slap
f4sled
fs2m
f2s1o
f3ste
fste4m
f3s4ti
f3stof
f3stu
2f1t
f4tene
f2th
f2tj
ft3je
ftwa4
1fu
f2un
2fuu
f3uur
2f1v
2f1w
1fy
4f1z
1ga
gaar3t
4gabc
gaby4
2g1ac
4gaft
4gafw
4gah
gal2a
ga4mes
gamo4
gan3d
gan4st
gapo4
4g3arb
g3arm
g3arti
ga2s
ga4se
gas3p
gas3tr
2gaut
4gavo
gazi2
2g1b
2g1c
2g1d
g3de
g4dell
g4dim
g3doe
gd2s
1ge
ge3a
ge4ari
4geb.
2g3ebb
2gebd
4gebt
ge1c
gedan4
gee4
ge3ei
g3eend
gee2r
gef4
4geff
gei4la
gei4tj
gek4l
ge3k4w
gel4da
gel4du
gel3f
gel3sa
gel3sn
4gemb
4gemf
4gemp
ge4ned
gen3k
ge4noc
ge4nof
ge4nog
gens4f
gen4su
gen4tr
ge1ra
ger4dr
ge4reng
ge1r2o
ger4sp
4gerts
ge3ru
ge1s2
ge3s4a
ge3sc
ge3sh
ge3sj
4ges4k
ge3s4m
ge3so
ges4p
ge3spl
ges4te
ge3ta
get4i
get4j
ge3t4w
3gev
2g1f2
4g3g4
gge4nol
2g1h
g2het
g2hum
1gi
gier4s
gi1eu
gi2f
2gij
gi4mes
gi4nes
2ginf
2g1j
2g1k
2gl
g3la2m
3gla4s
3glaz
g2le
g3leg
g3lei
g3ler
3glik
g2lim
gli4n
3glob
3glom
4g3lon
g1loo
g1lop
3g2ly
2g1m
2g1n
g3na
gneet3
g4ners
gne4tj
g2no
g3non
1go
go2a
2goc
g1och
godon4
god4s
2goef
goes3
4goh
go2k3
go2ma
go4mel
4g3ong
4gont
2g3oor
2gop
gop4la
4gore
4gorg
gor4s
go3tr
gou4dee
gouil4
2gov
2g1p
1g2r2
g3rak
gra2m
g4ra2s
gra4ves
2g3red
gree4
2grei
g3reis
4grem
gren4s
gre4s
g3rijk
